Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.025

Vacancies.

The presiding officer of the appropriate legislative chamber shall fill any vacancies occurring on the committee by appointment from the same political party as the departing member. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 44.39.015 as now or hereafter amended, any such appointee shall be deemed installed as a member upon appointment. Members filling vacancies shall serve until they or their successors are installed as provided in RCW 44.39.015, as now or hereafter amended, or until they are no longer members of the legislature, whichever is sooner.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 260 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.